Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.025

Deputy auditors—Assistant directors.

The state auditor may appoint deputies and assistant directors as necessary to carry out the duties of the office of the state auditor. These individuals serve at the pleasure of the state auditor and are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW as stated in RCW 41.06.070(1)(v).

[ 2020 c 18 s 14; 1995 c 301 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2020 c 18: See note following RCW 43.79A.040.